SpellChecking/Dictionaries/latin uyghur.aff
SET UTF-8
FLAG num
SFX 4945 Y 1
SFX 4945 0 a .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 g .
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 h .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 0 i .
SFX 2428 Y 1
SFX 2428 0 n .
SFX 2406 Y 1
SFX 2406 0 t .
SFX 839 Y 1
SFX 839 0 ning .
SFX 3554 Y 1
SFX 3554 0 da .
SFX 1626 Y 1
SFX 1626 0 ha .
SFX 556 Y 1
SFX 556 0 hi .
SFX 3926 Y 1
SFX 3926 0 hn .
SFX 2465 Y 1
SFX 2465 0 hu .
SFX 4603 Y 1
SFX 4603 0 la .
SFX 1037 Y 1
SFX 1037 0 glargha .
SFX 851 Y 1
SFX 851 0 gda .
SFX 2669 Y 1
SFX 2669 0 gha .
SFX 1156 Y 1
SFX 1156 0 gla .
SFX 3356 Y 1
SFX 3356 0 gli .
SFX 3525 Y 1
SFX 3525 0 hish .
SFX 3524 Y 1
SFX 3524 0 hlirini .
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 0 hni .
SFX 2293 Y 1
SFX 2293 0 hlar .
SFX 3732 Y 1
SFX 3732 0 hliq .
SFX 4659 Y 1
SFX 4659 0 glashmaq .
SFX 2927 Y 1
SFX 2927 0 gdek .
SFX 426 Y 1
SFX 426 0 gdin .
SFX 2922 Y 1
SFX 2922 0 gizdin .
SFX 2214 Y 1
SFX 2214 0 gliri .
SFX 2375 Y 1
SFX 2375 0 hidin .
SFX 2769 Y 1
SFX 2769 0 hliri .
SFX 2575 Y 1
SFX 2575 0 htek .
SFX 1236 Y 1
SFX 1236 0 htin .
SFX 4919 Y 1
SFX 4919 0 gizda .
SFX 3522 Y 1
SFX 3522 0 htur .
SFX 3937 Y 1
SFX 3937 0 glap .
SFX 136 Y 1
SFX 136 0 glar .
SFX 1998 Y 1
SFX 1998 0 gliq .
SFX 715 Y 1
SFX 715 0 glarni .
SFX 1921 Y 1
SFX 1921 0 gshen .
SFX 3294 Y 1
SFX 3294 0 mu .
SFX 4517 Y 1
SFX 4517 0 qa .
SFX 3735 Y 1
SFX 3735 0 glirini .
SFX 3936 Y 1
SFX 3936 0 glash .
SFX 3190 Y 1
SFX 3190 0 hidu .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 giz .
SFX 512 Y 1
SFX 512 0 gmu .
SFX 3932 Y 1
SFX 3932 0 gyi .
SFX 3354 Y 1
SFX 3354 0 hlarni .
SFX 2058 Y 1
SFX 2058 0 gchi .
SFX 4401 Y 1
SFX 4401 0 glishish .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 ggha .
SFX 2131 Y 1
SFX 2131 0 gghu .
SFX 4402 Y 1
SFX 4402 0 gigha .
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 0 gizgha .
SFX 1676 Y 1
SFX 1676 0 glarning .
SFX 2296 Y 1
SFX 2296 0 gizmu .
SFX 1771 Y 1
SFX 1771 0 higha .
SFX 3674 Y 1
SFX 3674 0 liri .
SFX 4645 Y 1
SFX 4645 0 htimu .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 gning .
SFX 3137 Y 1
SFX 3137 0 ng .
SFX 1047 Y 1
SFX 1047 0 ni .
SFX 1036 Y 1
SFX 1036 0 hning .
SFX 4397 Y 1
SFX 4397 0 himu .
SFX 3739 Y 1
SFX 3739 0 gji .
SFX 3738 Y 1
SFX 3738 0 gjn .
SFX 2665 Y 1
SFX 2665 0 gju .
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 0 gni .
SFX 2770 Y 1
SFX 2770 0 hla .
SFX 1674 Y 1
SFX 1674 0 hta .
SFX 4912 Y 1
SFX 4912 0 hte .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 hti .
SFX 4140 Y 1
SFX 4140 0 ini .
SFX 2578 Y 1
SFX 2578 0 gshi .
SFX 3934 Y 1
SFX 3934 0 gngide .
SFX 1399 Y 1
SFX 1399 0 hmaq .
SFX 1675 Y 1
SFX 1675 0 hining .
SFX 2661 Y 1
SFX 2661 0 hqan .
SFX 2772 Y 1
SFX 2772 0 gizning .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 0 gdiki .
SFX 990 Y 1
SFX 990 0 gizni .
SFX 4670 Y 1
SFX 4670 0 gching .
SFX 1575 Y 1
SFX 1575 0 glardin .
SFX 3737 Y 1
SFX 3737 0 glarda .
SFX 2793 Y 1
SFX 2793 0 din .
SFX 3076 Y 1
SFX 3076 0 ga .
SFX 4924 Y 1
SFX 4924 0 gd .
SFX 2472 Y 1
SFX 2472 0 ge .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 gi .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 0 gl .
SFX 4656 Y 1
SFX 4656 0 gx .
SFX 4399 Y 1
SFX 4399 0 gy .
SFX 4644 Y 1
SFX 4644 0 hyen .
SFX 2001 Y 1
SFX 2001 0 gge .
SFX 4651 Y 1
SFX 4651 0 hing .
SFX 1479 Y 1
SFX 1479 0 hini .
SFX 4655 Y 1
SFX 4655 0 har .
SFX 3528 Y 1
SFX 3528 0 hen .
SFX 3189 Y 1
SFX 3189 0 him .
SFX 3526 Y 1
SFX 3526 0 hin .
SFX 3066 Y 1
SFX 3066 0 hip .
SFX 3527 Y 1
SFX 3527 0 himiz .
SFX 1997 Y 1
SFX 1997 0 hmu .
SFX 1035 Y 1
SFX 1035 0 hqa .
SFX 3165 Y 1
SFX 3165 0 lar .
SFX 2880 Y 1
SFX 2880 0 liq .
SFX 4658 Y 1
SFX 4658 0 glimaq .
SFX 2466 Y 1
SFX 2466 0 htiki .
SFX 2664 Y 1
SFX 2664 0 glarmu .
SFX 4440 Y 1
SFX 4440 n yma n
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 r shliridin r
SFX 4494 Y 1
SFX 4494 t shliridin t
SFX 2334 Y 1
SFX 2334 r qlirini r
SFX 2249 Y 1
SFX 2249 s qlirini s
SFX 701 Y 1
SFX 701 k nishi k
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 m nishi m
SFX 2083 Y 1
SFX 2083 i rshige i
SFX 77 Y 1
SFX 77 a isining a
SFX 961 Y 1
SFX 961 a ung a
SFX 4167 Y 1
SFX 4167 t ghiniche t
SFX 637 Y 1
SFX 637 q nishi q
SFX 3389 Y 1
SFX 3389 n ydiki n
SFX 4875 Y 1
SFX 4875 a irgha a
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 i ung i
SFX 3705 Y 1
SFX 3705 l isining l
SFX 1762 Y 1
SFX 1762 a isidur a
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 o isining o
SFX 3792 Y 1
SFX 3792 o ung o
SFX 4475 Y 1
SFX 4475 p ung p
SFX 2263 Y 1
SFX 2263 r ndrp r
SFX 423 Y 1
SFX 423 a irimni a
SFX 3871 Y 1
SFX 3871 a lishi a
SFX 2810 Y 1
SFX 2810 a usiz a
SFX 2019 Y 1
SFX 2019 i ulghan i
SFX 4213 Y 1
SFX 4213 y ung y
SFX 4619 Y 1
SFX 4619 r irgha r
SFX 3672 Y 1
SFX 3672 d lishi d
SFX 1860 Y 1
SFX 1860 a enmek a
SFX 1050 Y 1
SFX 1050 k lishi k
SFX 4722 Y 1
SFX 4722 a uchilik a
SFX 4736 Y 1
SFX 4736 t shsh t
SFX 3545 Y 1
SFX 3545 i enmek i
SFX 1142 Y 1
SFX 1142 q lishi q
SFX 2784 Y 1
SFX 2784 k enmek k
SFX 1069 Y 1
SFX 1069 r lishi r
SFX 1209 Y 1
SFX 1209 p wtildi p
SFX 2348 Y 1
SFX 2348 s lishi s
SFX 1297 Y 1
SFX 1297 q lmaydighan q
SFX 1464 Y 1
SFX 1464 r lmaydighan r
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 a ishning a
SFX 4341 Y 1
SFX 4341 a itiwetken a
SFX 1609 Y 1
SFX 1609 q lup q
SFX 3372 Y 1
SFX 3372 i ekchi i
SFX 2260 Y 1
SFX 2260 a nimu a
SFX 1150 Y 1
SFX 1150 a iridur a
SFX 4872 Y 1
SFX 4872 o ishning o
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 a lardin a
SFX 4570 Y 1
SFX 4570 q lmaysen q
SFX 2341 Y 1
SFX 2341 d nimu d
SFX 4569 Y 1
SFX 4569 r lmaysen r
SFX 4283 Y 1
SFX 4283 k misingiz k
SFX 557 Y 1
SFX 557 i glarning i
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 d lardin d
SFX 1512 Y 1
SFX 1512 l ningmu l
SFX 754 Y 1
SFX 754 a iqimni a
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 a ilirigha a
SFX 378 Y 1
SFX 378 m ningmu m
SFX 2717 Y 1
SFX 2717 k nimu k
SFX 500 Y 1
SFX 500 l nimu l
SFX 2680 Y 1
SFX 2680 u ekchi u
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 m nimu m
SFX 2446 Y 1
SFX 2446 k lardin k
SFX 2920 Y 1
SFX 2920 e hmu e
SFX 4780 Y 1
SFX 4780 q nimu q
SFX 328 Y 1
SFX 328 a it a
SFX 1018 Y 1
SFX 1018 a ul a
SFX 3131 Y 1
SFX 3131 s nimu s
SFX 1521 Y 1
SFX 1521 q lardin q
SFX 3895 Y 1
SFX 3895 r lardin r
SFX 3835 Y 1
SFX 3835 t nimu t
SFX 850 Y 1
SFX 850 a ighanliqigha a
SFX 1052 Y 1
SFX 1052 s lardin s
SFX 4600 Y 1
SFX 4600 t lardin t
SFX 4631 Y 1
SFX 4631 o ilirigha o
SFX 3209 Y 1
SFX 3209 a erla a
SFX 4574 Y 1
SFX 4574 e lk e
SFX 1022 Y 1
SFX 1022 z nimu z
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 i ul i
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 l it l
SFX 4611 Y 1
SFX 4611 n it n
SFX 4047 Y 1
SFX 4047 l nik l
SFX 3121 Y 1
SFX 3121 t rdur t
SFX 678 Y 1
SFX 678 o it o
SFX 1894 Y 1
SFX 1894 k lk k
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 i etti i
SFX 4785 Y 1
SFX 4785 r ngendek r
SFX 3702 Y 1
SFX 3702 s it s
SFX 3105 Y 1
SFX 3105 a turushmaq a
SFX 2076 Y 1
SFX 2076 r shtimu r
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 t it t
SFX 243 Y 1
SFX 243 p etti p
SFX 4015 Y 1
SFX 4015 r shkchi r
SFX 4620 Y 1
SFX 4620 a ire a
SFX 2482 Y 1
SFX 2482 i chilardin i
SFX 603 Y 1
SFX 603 a sa a
SFX 4220 Y 1
SFX 4220 b tmaq b
SFX 4191 Y 1
SFX 4191 m chilardin m
SFX 644 Y 1
SFX 644 d sa d
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 a iliqlar a
SFX 2181 Y 1
SFX 2181 k llar k
SFX 837 Y 1
SFX 837 a uchilar a
SFX 1483 Y 1
SFX 1483 d ghimu d
SFX 1579 Y 1
SFX 1579 a duq a
SFX 3921 Y 1
SFX 3921 a iliqigha a
SFX 4303 Y 1
SFX 4303 q llar q
SFX 1449 Y 1
SFX 1449 r sa r
SFX 3324 Y 1
SFX 3324 q laymen q
SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421 a isiz a
SFX 2888 Y 1
SFX 2888 r laymen r
SFX 686 Y 1
SFX 686 t sa t
SFX 72 Y 1
SFX 72 m ngizni m
SFX 789 Y 1
SFX 789 p ngizni p
SFX 997 Y 1
SFX 997 z sa z
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 s ghimu s
SFX 67 Y 1
SFX 67 a ingiz a
SFX 694 Y 1
SFX 694 n yni n
SFX 3497 Y 1
SFX 3497 l isiz l
SFX 1079 Y 1
SFX 1079 t duq t
SFX 2233 Y 1
SFX 2233 i udiki i
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 o isiz o
SFX 3072 Y 1
SFX 3072 z ghimu z
SFX 4483 Y 1
SFX 4483 z sir z
SFX 1514 Y 1
SFX 1514 y ngizni y
SFX 1832 Y 1
SFX 1832 d ru d
SFX 4435 Y 1
SFX 4435 r zil r
SFX 1178 Y 1
SFX 1178 l ingiz l
SFX 567 Y 1
SFX 567 a udek a
SFX 2874 Y 1
SFX 2874 k lse k
SFX 2908 Y 1
SFX 2908 n ingiz n
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 o ingiz o
SFX 4546 Y 1
SFX 4546 m nchilik m
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 p genlikini p
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 m nglarmu m
SFX 4478 Y 1
SFX 4478 i udek i
SFX 2890 Y 1
SFX 2890 a lashtur a
SFX 4784 Y 1
SFX 4784 p nglarmu p
SFX 4197 Y 1
SFX 4197 n yidiki n
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 a itilmaq a
SFX 1363 Y 1
SFX 1363 a inimni a
SFX 3653 Y 1
SFX 3653 a mighanidi a
SFX 4680 Y 1
SFX 4680 a dr a
SFX 1869 Y 1
SFX 1869 p walghanda p
SFX 4286 Y 1
SFX 4286 l mighanidi l
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 k lgha k
SFX 2020 Y 1
SFX 2020 a uchigha a
SFX 181 Y 1
SFX 181 i gizdin i
SFX 4205 Y 1
SFX 4205 p werme p
SFX 2517 Y 1
SFX 2517 m nar m
SFX 4746 Y 1
SFX 4746 d rlarni d
SFX 1196 Y 1
SFX 1196 q lgha q
SFX 4830 Y 1
SFX 4830 r lgha r
SFX 1586 Y 1
SFX 1586 p wridighan p
SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 k ndi k
SFX 4062 Y 1
SFX 4062 q nar q
SFX 2516 Y 1
SFX 2516 l ndi l
SFX 1533 Y 1
SFX 1533 i gi i
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 m ndi m
SFX 1725 Y 1
SFX 1725 k gi k
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 q ndi q
SFX 4424 Y 1
SFX 4424 t dr t
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 r ndi r
SFX 2468 Y 1
SFX 2468 p gi p
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 t ndi t
SFX 3421 Y 1
SFX 3421 t rlarni t
SFX 3377 Y 1
SFX 3377 t diken t
SFX 4045 Y 1
SFX 4045 k nishini k
SFX 2026 Y 1
SFX 2026 d rim d
SFX 3441 Y 1
SFX 3441 m nishini m
SFX 400 Y 1
SFX 400 a isiman a
SFX 2041 Y 1
SFX 2041 a iwalmaq a
SFX 2257 Y 1
SFX 2257 q nishini q
SFX 2467 Y 1
SFX 2467 a hmaq a
SFX 4127 Y 1
SFX 4127 l isiman l
SFX 2921 Y 1
SFX 2921 i hmaq i
SFX 4867 Y 1
SFX 4867 o isiman o
SFX 822 Y 1
SFX 822 r qqa r
SFX 4888 Y 1
SFX 4888 a imisila a
SFX 4748 Y 1
SFX 4748 t rim t
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 s qqa s
SFX 2248 Y 1
SFX 2248 t qqa t
SFX 4338 Y 1
SFX 4338 a iwlishqa a
SFX 1765 Y 1
SFX 1765 a inishning a
SFX 2934 Y 1
SFX 2934 i eni i
SFX 1979 Y 1
SFX 1979 a isingizmu a
SFX 4649 Y 1
SFX 4649 a hishi a
SFX 3976 Y 1
SFX 3976 n ylimaq n
SFX 3859 Y 1
SFX 3859 a maysen a
SFX 734 Y 1
SFX 734 a ishatti a
SFX 4755 Y 1
SFX 4755 z qqa z
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 i ursimu i
SFX 4104 Y 1
SFX 4104 k lgendin k
SFX 4807 Y 1
SFX 4807 l maysen l
SFX 3361 Y 1
SFX 3361 d ghaniken d
SFX 3206 Y 1
SFX 3206 i etlirini i
SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 a itish a
SFX 2607 Y 1
SFX 2607 r shmasliq r
SFX 1291 Y 1
SFX 1291 m ngizde m
SFX 2281 Y 1
SFX 2281 a irighiche a
SFX 2746 Y 1
SFX 2746 l itish l
SFX 2594 Y 1
SFX 2594 p watidila p
SFX 180 Y 1
SFX 180 a idek a
SFX 4009 Y 1
SFX 4009 a singiz a
SFX 3413 Y 1
SFX 3413 r shkendin r
SFX 2548 Y 1
SFX 2548 o itish o
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 a ti a
SFX 2095 Y 1
SFX 2095 m nlirigha m
SFX 2788 Y 1
SFX 2788 i ekte i
SFX 1827 Y 1
SFX 1827 b ti b
SFX 1945 Y 1
SFX 1945 d singiz d
SFX 3393 Y 1
SFX 3393 p wlishidin p
SFX 367 Y 1
SFX 367 a irinimu a
SFX 4222 Y 1
SFX 4222 i ti i
SFX 1368 Y 1
SFX 1368 l idek l
SFX 1813 Y 1
SFX 1813 o idek o
SFX 1371 Y 1
SFX 1371 u ekte u
SFX 3988 Y 1
SFX 3988 p walar p
SFX 3593 Y 1
SFX 3593 r singiz r
SFX 3391 Y 1
SFX 3391 p wtilip p
SFX 2968 Y 1
SFX 2968 t singiz t
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 p waldi p
SFX 3060 Y 1
SFX 3060 a ighanliqining a
SFX 4484 Y 1
SFX 4484 z singiz z
SFX 2945 Y 1
SFX 2945 i chiliridin i
SFX 2897 Y 1
SFX 2897 s kchimen s
SFX 3010 Y 1
SFX 3010 l midu l
SFX 3819 Y 1
SFX 3819 a rat a
SFX 2332 Y 1
SFX 2332 d rat d
SFX 4916 Y 1
SFX 4916 e hchan e
SFX 4295 Y 1
SFX 4295 l manning l
SFX 1669 Y 1
SFX 1669 a ishidiki a
SFX 3329 Y 1
SFX 3329 t jin t
SFX 4505 Y 1
SFX 4505 d rishish d
SFX 4302 Y 1
SFX 4302 k llarning k
SFX 925 Y 1
SFX 925 t rdiki t
SFX 3630 Y 1
SFX 3630 q nliqigha q
SFX 3514 Y 1
SFX 3514 a ikimni a
SFX 614 Y 1
SFX 614 i umgha i
SFX 1800 Y 1
SFX 1800 a liqni a
SFX 3675 Y 1
SFX 3675 d liqni d
SFX 2566 Y 1
SFX 2566 a ighuchilarning a
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 p wtip p
SFX 3740 Y 1
SFX 3740 s ghining s
SFX 1932 Y 1
SFX 1932 i chimu i
SFX 4519 Y 1
SFX 4519 i pini i
SFX 4095 Y 1
SFX 4095 q liqni q
SFX 3765 Y 1
SFX 3765 m chimu m
SFX 4034 Y 1
SFX 4034 n pini n
SFX 4274 Y 1
SFX 4274 r ndrshsh r
SFX 2647 Y 1
SFX 2647 a iringning a
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 k nish k
SFX 873 Y 1
SFX 873 m nish m
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 e hsh e
SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 q nish q
SFX 4518 Y 1
SFX 4518 y pini y
SFX 4074 Y 1
SFX 4074 d meydu d
SFX 4597 Y 1
SFX 4597 q lidighanliqi q
SFX 4905 Y 1
SFX 4905 a ighanlarmu a
SFX 3096 Y 1
SFX 3096 i yanggha i
SFX 1354 Y 1
SFX 1354 k meydu k
SFX 662 Y 1
SFX 662 a idingiz a
SFX 4765 Y 1
SFX 4765 y ptur y
SFX 4038 Y 1
SFX 4038 m nlirim m
SFX 4773 Y 1
SFX 4773 m nliqqa m
SFX 1939 Y 1
SFX 1939 p walmay p
SFX 1854 Y 1
SFX 1854 a imasliqi a
SFX 4957 Y 1
SFX 4957 n ylargha n
SFX 4288 Y 1
SFX 4288 t meydu t
SFX 2289 Y 1
SFX 2289 a ighay a
SFX 2146 Y 1
SFX 2146 i yan i
SFX 1559 Y 1
SFX 1559 a lirida a
